Utah statutes.
77-40-110.   Use of expunged records -- Individuals -- Use in civil actions.
Records expunged under Section 77-40-104 or 77-40-105 may be released to or
viewed by the following individuals:
(1)  the petitioner;
(2)  a law enforcement officer who was involved in the case, for use solely in
the officer's defense of a civil action arising out of the officer's
involvement with the petitioner in that particular case; and
(3)  parties to a civil action arising out of the expunged incident, providing
the information is kept confidential and utilized only in the action.
